Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-204] Specialist in cooperative
organizations. The university may appoint a specialist in cooperative
organizations and may extend the present agriculture extension service work to
cooperatives. The specialist shall assist cooperatives in legal, accounting,
business, and marketing practices and instruct them in fundamentals of
cooperative principles. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next